Hawaii statutes.
[§145D-5] Reserving the State's authority
to regulate, inspect, or ban the use of donated food. Nothing in this
chapter is intended to restrict the authority of the department of health or
the department of agriculture to regulate, inspect, or ban the use of such
donated foods for human consumption. [L 1982, c 260, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next